Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-356
Installment loans; assignment of wages; instruments in blank.

(1) No licensee shall receive any security agreement or assignment of salary or wages signed in blank. All blank spaces shall be filled in with ink or typewritten or printed with the proper names and amounts showing the name of the person by whom the individual making the conveyance or assignment is employed. No assignment or order for wages is valid if it contains an amount in excess of the sum borrowed together with the interest and charges as provided in the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.

(2) No assignment of or order for wages to secure a loan or advancement is valid when made by a married man or woman unless the written consent of the wife or husband to the making of such loan is attached thereto.

(3) No licensee shall take a power of attorney, or any instrument signed by an attorney in fact and not personally, or any instrument signed in which blanks are left to be filled after execution.

Laws 2016, LB778, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 77.